uz.aff
SFX Z 0 tkizsakdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsakmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsakku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsang . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangiz . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlar . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlarmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlardir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlarda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlardirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsangizlarku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsa . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsaku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalar . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalarmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalardir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalarda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalardirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizsalarku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasam . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasammi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasamdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasamda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasamdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasammikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasamku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasak . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasakku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasang . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangiz . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizdir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlar . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlarmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlardir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlarda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlardirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasangizlarku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasa . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasami . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasadir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasada . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasadirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasamikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasaku . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalar . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalarmi . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalardir . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalarda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalardirda . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalarmikan . 
SFX Z 0 tkizmasalarku . 
SFX Z 0 shim . 
SFX Z 0 shing . 
SFX Z 0 shi . 
SFX Z 0 shimiz . 
SFX Z 0 shingiz . 
SFX Z 0 masligim . 
SFX Z 0 masliging . 
SFX Z 0 masligi . 
SFX Z 0 masligimiz . 
SFX Z 0 masligingiz . 
SFX Z 0 shimmi . 
SFX Z 0 shimdir . 
SFX Z 0 shimda . 
SFX Z 0 shimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimku . 
SFX Z 0 shingmi . 
SFX Z 0 shingdir . 
SFX Z 0 shingda . 
SFX Z 0 shingdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shingmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shingku . 
SFX Z 0 shimi . 
SFX Z 0 shidir . 
SFX Z 0 shida . 
SFX Z 0 shidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shiku . 
SFX Z 0 shimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 shimizda . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimizku . 
SFX Z 0 shingizmi . 
SFX Z 0 shingizdir . 
SFX Z 0 shingizda . 
SFX Z 0 shingizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 shingizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shingizku . 
SFX Z 0 masligimmi . 
SFX Z 0 masligimdir . 
SFX Z 0 masligimda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimdirda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimmikan . 
SFX Z 0 masligimku . 
SFX Z 0 masligingmi . 
SFX Z 0 masligingdir . 
SFX Z 0 masligingda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingdirda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingmikan . 
SFX Z 0 masligingku . 
SFX Z 0 masligimi . 
SFX Z 0 masligidir . 
SFX Z 0 masligida . 
SFX Z 0 masligidirda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimikan . 
SFX Z 0 masligiku . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizmi . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizdir . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizku . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizmi . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizdir . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizdirda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizmikan . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizku . 
SFX Z 0 shimni . 
SFX Z 0 shimning . 
SFX Z 0 shimga . 
SFX Z 0 shimdan . 
SFX Z 0 shimda . 
SFX Z 0 shingni . 
SFX Z 0 shingning . 
SFX Z 0 shingga . 
SFX Z 0 shingdan . 
SFX Z 0 shingda . 
SFX Z 0 shini . 
SFX Z 0 shining . 
SFX Z 0 shiga . 
SFX Z 0 shidan . 
SFX Z 0 shida . 
SFX Z 0 shimizni . 
SFX Z 0 shimizning . 
SFX Z 0 shimizga . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 shimizda . 
SFX Z 0 shingizni . 
SFX Z 0 shingizning . 
SFX Z 0 shingizga . 
SFX Z 0 shingizdan . 
SFX Z 0 shingizda . 
SFX Z 0 masligimni . 
SFX Z 0 masligimning . 
SFX Z 0 masligimga . 
SFX Z 0 masligimdan . 
SFX Z 0 masligimda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingni . 
SFX Z 0 masligingning . 
SFX Z 0 masligingga . 
SFX Z 0 masligingdan . 
SFX Z 0 masligingda . 
SFX Z 0 masligini . 
SFX Z 0 masligining . 
SFX Z 0 masligiga . 
SFX Z 0 masligidan . 
SFX Z 0 masligida . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizni . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizning . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizga . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizdan . 
SFX Z 0 masligimizda . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizni . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizning . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizga . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizdan . 
SFX Z 0 masligingizda . 
SFX Z 0 shni . 
SFX Z 0 shning . 
SFX Z 0 shga . 
SFX Z 0 shdan . 
SFX Z 0 shda . 
SFX Z 0 maslikni . 
SFX Z 0 maslikning . 
SFX Z 0 maslikga . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdan . 
SFX Z 0 maslikda . 
SFX Z 0 shnimi . 
SFX Z 0 shnidir . 
SFX Z 0 shnida . 
SFX Z 0 shnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shniku . 
SFX Z 0 shgami . 
SFX Z 0 shgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shgada . 
SFX Z 0 shgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shdami . 
SFX Z 0 shdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shdada . 
SFX Z 0 shdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shdaku . 
SFX Z 0 masliknimi . 
SFX Z 0 masliknidir . 
SFX Z 0 masliknida . 
SFX Z 0 masliknidirda . 
SFX Z 0 masliknimikan . 
SFX Z 0 maslikniku . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgami . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgadir . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgada . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maslikgaku . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdandir . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdanda . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdanku . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdami . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdadir . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdada . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 maslikdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shimnimi . 
SFX Z 0 shimnidir . 
SFX Z 0 shimnida . 
SFX Z 0 shimnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimniku . 
SFX Z 0 shimgami . 
SFX Z 0 shimgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shimgada . 
SFX Z 0 shimgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shimdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shimdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shimdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shimdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shimdami . 
SFX Z 0 shimdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shimdada . 
SFX Z 0 shimdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shingnimi . 
SFX Z 0 shingnidir . 
SFX Z 0 shingnida . 
SFX Z 0 shingnidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shingnimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shingniku . 
SFX Z 0 shinggami . 
SFX Z 0 shinggadir . 
SFX Z 0 shinggada . 
SFX Z 0 shinggadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shinggamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shinggaku . 
SFX Z 0 shingdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shingdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shingdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shingdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shingdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shingdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shingdami . 
SFX Z 0 shingdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shingdada . 
SFX Z 0 shingdadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shingdamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shingdaku . 
SFX Z 0 shinimi . 
SFX Z 0 shinidir . 
SFX Z 0 shinida . 
SFX Z 0 shinidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shinimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shiniku . 
SFX Z 0 shigami . 
SFX Z 0 shigadir . 
SFX Z 0 shigada . 
SFX Z 0 shigadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shigamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shigaku . 
SFX Z 0 shidanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shidandir . 
SFX Z 0 shidanda . 
SFX Z 0 shidandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shidanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shidanku . 
SFX Z 0 shidami . 
SFX Z 0 shidadir . 
SFX Z 0 shidada . 
SFX Z 0 shidadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shidamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shidaku . 
SFX Z 0 shimiznimi . 
SFX Z 0 shimiznidir . 
SFX Z 0 shimiznida . 
SFX Z 0 shimiznidirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimiznimikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimizniku . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgami . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgadir . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgada . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgadirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgamikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimizgaku . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdanmi . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdandir . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdanda . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdandirda . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdanmikan . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdanku . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdami . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdadir . 
SFX Z 0 shimizdada . 
