uz.dic
avayla/Z
ag’na/Z
ajrimla/Z
ayna/Z
alangala/Z
alahsira/Z
alizarinla/Z
amalla/Z
angla/Z
aprobatsiyala/Z
arilla/Z
archi/Z
asfal’tla/Z
attangla/Z
achi/Z
bag’irla/Z
balansla/Z
bargla/Z
bastala/Z
bashanglai/Z
bezangla/Z
belgila/Z
berkla/Z
big’big’la/Z
bijbijla/Z
biyla/Z
bilangla/Z
bilchilla/Z
bobirla/Z
bodra/Z
boltala/Z
botmonla/Z
boshla/Z
bo’g’ovla/Z
bo’ybo’yla/Z
buqoqla/Z
bulinqira/Z
bo’rala/Z
burdala/Z
burovla/Z
bo’tala/Z
butla/Z
bo’ya/Z
vadilla/Z
vajilla/Z
vaksala/Z
valangla/Z
vang’irla/Z
varqilla/Z
vahvahla/Z
vyorstkala/Z
vijirvijirla/Z
viqirla/Z
visirla/Z
vozilla/Z
voldira/Z
gajakla/Z
galdira/Z
garilla/Z
gijingla/Z
grimla/Z
guvra/Z
gumburla/Z
gupurla/Z
guruqla/Z
davola/Z
dakkila/Z
darajala/Z
dastala/Z
depsa/Z
dikilla/Z
dingilla/Z
dovdira/Z
donla/Z
duvurla/Z
dukdukla/Z
do’qilla/Z
do’mbirla/Z
duragayla/Z
dutla/Z
yodla/Z
yoqlai/Z
yelkala/Z
yemla/Z
yonla/Z
yetakla/Z
yotsira/Z
jadalla/Z
jangirla/Z
jivilla/Z
jildira/Z
jimi/Z
jirvirla/Z
jodila/Z
juganla/Z
juftala/Z
zanjirla/Z
zarhalla/Z
ziqla/Z
zirilla/Z
zokla/Z
zuvzuvla/Z
ivi/Z
ijikila/Z
izolyatsiyala/Z
iyla/Z
iiringla/Z
ilgarila/Z
imzola/Z
imola/Z
ingra/Z
irg’a/Z
iri/Z
iska/Z
issiqla/Z
yo’lla/Z
iflosla/Z
ishkalla/Z
ishla/Z
kavsha/Z
kaldyra/Z
kapala/Z
kartilla/Z
kengai/Z
keskila/Z
kirla/Z
kishtkishtla/Z
kovakla/Z
konvertla/Z
kosovla/Z
kuza/Z
kukkula/Z
kulunkdra/Z
ko’pikla/Z
ko’rinqira/Z
kusa/Z
qabarinqira/Z
qavarchi/Z
qadrla/Z
qaytala/Z
qaqra/Z
qaltilla/Z
qang’si/Z
qara/Z
qarichla/Z
qatiqla/Z
qatna/Z
qashla/Z
qiyosla/Z
qiyqnlla/Z
qiyshangla/Z
qilpilla/Z
qimchi/Z
qirrala/Z
qirchi/Z
qistalangla/Z
qichi/Z
qnmirla/Z
qo’zila/Z
qo’llab-qo’ltiqla/Z
qo’ndoqla/Z
qo’rg’onla/Z
qurqura/Z
quruqsha/Z
qutla/Z
qo’shryoqla/Z
lapangla/Z
likangla/Z
linterla/Z
lirqira/Z
logarifmala/Z
lopilla/Z
lo’killa/Z
madhiyala/Z
maqta/Z
mengza/Z
miyovla/Z
miqtila/Z
miltilla/Z
misla/Z
moyla/Z
muji/Z
muqovala/Z
mumla/Z
murchla/Z
navbatla/Z
naqshla/Z
narkozla/Z
nafratla/Z
nemischala/Z
niqobla/Z
nishobla/Z
nomla/Z
nura/Z
obkatkala/Z
og’ri/Z
okuchnikla/Z
olqa/Z
orala/Z
osig’lai/Z
ohorla/Z
pag’ala/Z
paqirla/Z
pang’illa/Z
parvarishla/Z
parmala/Z
pastla/Z
piyla/Z
pilpilla/Z
pixilla/Z
pishpishla/Z
plugla/Z
pokla/Z
popirla/Z
portla/Z
propiskala/Z
po’ng’illa/Z
po’rsilla/Z
po’shtpo’shtla/Z
rasola/Z
reykala/Z
ro’yxatla/Z
savag’ichla/Z
sakilla/Z
salmoqla/Z
sanochla/Z
sarvixiro/Z
sasi/Z
seklya/Z
sensira/Z
serpi/Z
siyla/Z
silliqla/Z
sipkala/Z
sirla/Z
sixla/Z
soddala/Z
sopla/Z
sterilizatsiyala/Z
so’vsira/Z
so’zla/Z
so’linqira/Z
so’ra/Z
so’rla/Z
sufla/Z
tavsifla/Z
takilla/Z
taktakla/Z
taqiqla/Z
taqqosla/Z
taltangla/Z
tamsha/Z
tandala/Z
taraqla/Z
tarbiyalai/Z
tasirla/Z
tatbiqla/Z
taxla/Z
tahqiqla/Z
tashnala/Z
ta’rifla/Z
tezakla/Z
tentirakla/Z
terga/Z
tig’a/Z
tizilla/Z
tila/Z
timdala/Z
tingla/Z
tinchi/Z
tiraqayla/Z
tirkishla/Z
tirsakla/Z
titra/Z
tnlkala/Z
tojikla/Z
tomchila/Z
torsnlla/Z
tuga/Z
to’g’ra/Z
to’zg’i/Z
to’qilla/Z
to’qmoqla/Z
to’lqinla/Z
tuna/Z
to’pilla/Z
turkiyla/Z
turmakla/Z
tusmolla/Z
tutqila/Z
to’sha/Z
uvilla/Z
ugitla/Z
o’zakla/Z
uyqusira/Z
o’ynoqla/Z
o’ksi/Z
o’qchi/Z
uloqla/Z
o’nna/Z
o’ra/Z
urmo/Z
urchi/Z
o’smoqchila/Z
o’tkirla/Z
o’xchi/Z
uchinqira/Z
uchra/Z
uyumla/Z
fanerla/Z
fosforla/Z
xarajatla/Z
xaspo’shla/Z
xilla/Z
xiriala/Z
xixla/Z
xolisla/Z
xomitla/Z
xotirla/Z
xronometrajla/Z
xo’rilla/Z
xushbo’yla/Z
chavotsla/Z
chayna/Z
chaqala/Z
chaqchaqla/Z
chamala/Z
changla/Z
chapakla/Z
charqilla/Z
charcha/Z
chegala/Z
chekla/Z
chechakla/Z
chiyovla/Z
chizilla/Z
chiychiyla/Z
chiqirla/Z
chimdila/Z
chimchila/Z
ching’irla/Z
chirilla/Z
chirqira/Z
chitilla/Z
chovlila/Z
chopqila/Z
chuvi/Z
chuvchuvla/Z
cho’kichla/Z
cho’qqila/Z
cho’lla/Z
churqchurqla/Z
chuhla/Z
chuchula/Z
shayla/Z
shaldira/Z
shamolla/Z
shapaloqla/Z
shatilla/Z
shivala/Z
shig’illa/Z
shikastla/Z
shiliqla/Z
shiltilla/Z
shipilla/Z
shirilla/Z
shitirla/Z
shlrynla/Z
shovulla/Z
shoshilinqira/Z
shuldira/Z
sho’rla/Z
egurgila/Z
eyla/Z
ekranla/Z
elab-chalqa/Z
elang’ochla/Z
elib-yulqi/Z
elqovsira/Z
elpangla/Z
eltira/Z
emgakla/Z
emla/Z
erkakla/Z
etatla/Z
yumala/Z
yangila/Z
yarqira/Z
yashna/Z
